South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-3-21.  Beginning with the session of the General Assembly beginning in 2027, as a supplement to any in-district compensation set forth in the annual general appropriations act, all members of the General Assembly shall receive an additional in-district compensation of one thousand dollars each month to be used to hire private security or install security devices. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----